Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 1. Driver’s License.

§ 63-1-1.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the Highway Safety Patrol and Driver’s License Law of 1938.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8076; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 63-1-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this article shall, for the purpose of such law, have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section:

The term “commissioner” means the commissioner of public safety of this state;

The term “highway” means every way or place of whatever nature open to the use of the public for the purpose of vehicular travel, and shall include streets of municipalities;

The term “operator” means any person in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on the highway;

The term “owner” means a person who holds the legal title of a vehicle; in the event a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, or in the event a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such conditional vendee or lessee or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner for the purpose of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8077; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 63-1-5.
Requirement of motor vehicle operator’s license; types of operator’s licenses; penalty for violation of section.

No person shall drive or operate a motor vehicle or an autocycle as defined in Section 63-3-103 upon the highways of the State of Mississippi without first securing an operator’s license to drive on the highways of the state, unless specifically exempted by Section 63-1-7.

The types of operator’s licenses are:

Class R;

Class D;

Class A, B or C commercial license governed by Article 5 of this chapter;

Intermediate license; and

Interlock-restricted license as prescribed in Section 63-11-31.

Every person who makes application for an original license or a renewal license to operate any single vehicle with a gross weight rating of less than twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds or any vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds other than vehicles included in Class C, vehicles which require a special endorsement, or to operate a vehicle as a common carrier by motor vehicle, taxicab, passenger coach, dray, contract carrier or private commercial carrier as defined in Section 27-19-3, other than those vehicles for which a Class A, B or C license is required under Article 5 of this chapter, may, in lieu of the Class R regular driver’s license, apply for and obtain a Class D driver’s license. The fee for the issuance of a Class D driver’s license shall be as set forth in Section 63-1-43 and the Class D license shall be valid for the term prescribed in Section 63-1-47. Except as required under Article 5 of this chapter, no driver of a pickup truck shall be required to have a Class D or a commercial license regardless of the purpose for which the pickup truck is used.

Persons operating vehicles listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection for private purposes or in emergencies need not obtain a Class D license.

An interlock-restricted license allows a person to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with an iginition-interlock device.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be punished by imprisonment for not less than two (2) days nor more than six (6) months, by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8091; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 468, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 8; Laws, 2015, ch. 406, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 8, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2016.

§ 63-1-6.
Requirement of motorcycle operator’s license; requirement of temporary motorcycle permit.

Unless exempted under Section 63-1-7 or Section 63-1-6.1, no person shall drive or operate a motorcycle, except for an autocycle as defined in Section 63-3-103, upon the highways of the State of Mississippi without first securing an operator’s license with a motorcycle endorsement upon it.

A motorcycle endorsement may be issued to any person who holds a valid Mississippi driver’s license and meets the other requirements for a motorcycle endorsement contained in this chapter.

Every applicant for a motorcycle endorsement shall first obtain a temporary motorcycle permit, successfully complete the examination provided in Section 63-1-33, and pay the temporary motorcycle permit fee and examination fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43. Applicants for a temporary motorcycle permit shall:

Be at least fifteen (15) years of age;

Operate a motorcycle only under the direct supervision of a person at least twenty-one (21) years of age who possesses either a valid driver’s or operator’s license with a motorcycle endorsement or a valid restricted motorcycle operator’s license;

Be prohibited from transporting a passenger on a motorcycle;

Be prohibited from operating a motorcycle upon any controlled access highway; and

Be prohibited from operating a motorcycle during the hours of 6:00 p.m. through 6:00 a.m.

Temporary motorcycle driving permits shall be valid for the same period of time and may be renewed upon the same conditions as regular learner’s permits issued under Section 63-1-21.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 9; Laws, 2015, ch. 406, § 3; Laws, 2015, ch. 464, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-1-6.1.
Rented motor scooters may be operated on public roads in or near universities without obtaining motorcycle endorsement under certain circumstances.

No person shall be required to secure a driver’s license with a motorcycle endorsement upon it while operating a motor scooter as defined in Section 63-3-103 provided that:

The person is not the owner of the motor scooter and is only renting the scooter for a period of time not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours.

The person is operating the motor scooter within the corporate limits of a municipality in which a university campus is located or is immediately adjacent to, or within the limits of, the university’s campus.

The person has been issued and has on their person a regular or commercial driver’s license issued by the State of Mississippi or the state of their residence.

Any scooter operated on the roads or highways of this state under this section shall not be operated:

At a rate of speed greater than thirty (30) miles per hour;

On a road which has a speed limit greater than thirty-five (35) miles per hour; or

On any road or highway which is prohibited under Section 63-3-210.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 464, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-1-7.
Exemption from license requirement.

No license issued pursuant to this article shall be required of:

Any person while operating a motor vehicle for military purposes, if the person is a member of the United States Armed Forces or Reserves on active duty, a member of the National Guard on active duty or full-time National Guard duty, a National Guard military technician, or participating in part-time National Guard training.

Any nonresident person who has in his immediate possession a valid license to drive a motor vehicle on the highways of his home state or country, issued to him by the proper authorities of his home state or country, or of any nonresident person whose home state or country does not require the licensing of a person to operate a motor vehicle on the highways but does require him to be duly registered. Such person being eighteen (18) years of age or older may operate a motor vehicle in the state for a period of sixty (60) consecutive days without securing a license. However, any nonresident person operating a motor vehicle in this state shall be subject to all the provisions of this article, except as specified above.

Any person while operating a road roller, road machinery or any farm tractor or implement of husbandry temporarily drawn, moved or propelled on the highways.

Any engineer or motorman using tracks for road or street, though used in the streets.

Any person while operating an electric personal assistive mobility device as defined in Section 63-3-103.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8092; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 588, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 485, § 7; Laws, 2005, ch. 541, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 342, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 63-1-8.
Authorization to negotiate reciprocal driver’s license agreement with the Republic of China (Taiwan).

The Commissioner of Public Safety is authorized to negotiate a mutual agreement between the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the Republic of China (Taiwan), through the Ministry of Transportation and Communications represented by the Director General of the Taipei Economic and Cultural Office in Houston, Texas, for reciprocity in issuing driver’s licenses to citizens of the State of Mississippi residing in the Republic of China (Taiwan) and to Taiwanese citizens residing in the State of Mississippi. The mutual agreement shall be written and signed by the commissioner and Director General.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 438, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 26, 2014).

§ 63-1-9.
Persons prohibited from obtaining license; issuance of regular learner’s
permits, intermediate licenses and driver’s licenses.

No driver’s license, intermediate license or regular learner’s permit shall be issued pursuant to this article:

To any person under the age of eighteen (18) years except as provided in this article.

To any person whose license to operate a motor vehicle on the highways of Mississippi has been previously revoked or suspended by this state or any other state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia, if the revocation or suspension period has not expired.

To any person who is an habitual drunkard or who is addicted to the use of other narcotic drugs.

To any person who would not be able by reason of physical or mental disability to operate a motor vehicle on the highways with safety. However, persons who have one (1) arm or leg, or have arms or legs deformed, and are driving a car provided with mechanical devices whereby the person is able to drive in a safe manner over the highways, if otherwise qualified, shall receive an operator’s license the same as other persons. Moreover, deafness shall not be a bar to obtaining a license.

To any person as an operator who has previously been adjudged to be afflicted with and suffering from any mental disability and who has not at time of application been restored to mental competency.

To any unmarried person under the age of eighteen (18) years who does not at the time of application present a diploma or other certificate of high school graduation or a general educational development certificate issued to the person in this state or any other state; or on whose behalf documentation has not been received by the Department of Public Safety from that person or a school official verifying that the person:

Is enrolled and making satisfactory progress in a course leading to a general educational development certificate;

Is enrolled in school in this state or any other state;

Is enrolled in a “nonpublic school,” as such term is defined in Section 37-13-91(2)(i); or

Is unable to attend any school program due to circumstances deemed acceptable as set out in Section 63-1-10.

To any person under the age of eighteen (18) years who has been convicted under Section 63-11-30.

All permits and licenses issued on or before July 31, 2009, shall be valid according to the terms upon which issued. From and after August 1, 2009:

A regular learner’s permit may be issued to any person who is at least fifteen (15) years of age who otherwise meets the requirements of this article.

An intermediate license may be issued to any person who is at least sixteen (16) years of age who otherwise meets the requirements of this article and who has held a regular learner’s permit for at least one (1) year without any conviction under Section 63-11-30 or of a moving violation. Any conviction under Section 63-11-30 or of a moving violation shall restart the one-year requirement for the holding of a regular learner’s permit before an applicant can qualify for an intermediate license.

A driver’s license may be issued to any person who is at least sixteen and one-half (16-1/2) years of age who otherwise meets the requirements of this article and who has held an intermediate license for at least six (6) months without any conviction under Section 63-11-30 or of a moving violation. Any conviction under Section 63-11-30 or of a moving violation shall restart the six-month requirement for the holding of an intermediate license before an applicant can qualify for a driver’s license. However, a person who is at least seventeen (17) years of age who has been issued a regular learner’s permit and who has never been convicted under Section 63-11-30 or of a moving violation shall not be required to have held an intermediate license.

An applicant for a Mississippi driver’s license who, at the time of application, is at least sixteen and one-half (16-1/2) years of age and who has held a valid motor vehicle driver’s license issued by another state for at least six (6) months shall not be required to hold a regular learner’s permit or an intermediate license before being issued a driver’s license.

The commissioner shall ensure that the regular learner’s permit, intermediate license and driver’s license issued under this article are clear, distinct and easily distinguishable from one another.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8093; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 588, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 540, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 624, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 19, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 63-1-10.
Educational requirements for issuance of license to person under eighteen years of age; documentation; appeal of denial of license.

Upon the written request of a parent or guardian of any applicant for a license under eighteen (18) years of age, the school district in which the applicant is enrolled shall submit documentation to the Department of Public Safety verifying that the applicant is in compliance with Section 63-1-9(1)(g). The verification shall be signed by the school principal or his designee, or, in the case of a home study program, the parent, or the adult education supervisor of the General Educational Development Program or his designee. If the student is enrolled in a nonpublic school, the school principal or his designee is encouraged to submit the verification on behalf of the student. Documentation of the applicant’s enrollment status shall be submitted on a form designed by the State Department of Education that includes the written signed and notarized parent or guardian’s consent authorizing the release of the applicant’s attendance records to the Department of Public Safety, as approved by the Department of Public Safety, in a manner that insures the authenticity of the form and the information or signature contained thereon, including via facsimile. The forms required under this section to provide documentation shall be made available to all public high schools, private schools accredited by the State Board of Education, adult education supervisors at school board offices and, upon request, to others through the Department of Public Safety.

Whenever an applicant or licensee who is under eighteen (18) years of age is unable to attend any school program due to acceptable circumstances, the school where the student last attended shall transmit documentation to the department to excuse such student from the provisions of Section 63-1-9(1)(g). The school principal or his designee shall determine whether nonattendance or absences are excused pursuant to Section 37-13-91. For purposes of this section, suspension or expulsion from school or incarceration in a correctional institution is not an acceptable circumstance for a person being unable to attend school.

Any person denied a license for failure to satisfy the education requirements of Section 63-1-9(1)(g) shall have the right to file a request within thirty (30) days thereafter for a hearing before the Department of Public Safety to determine whether the person is entitled to a license or is subject to the cancellation of his license under the provisions of this section. The hearing shall be held within ten (10) days of the receipt by the department of the request. Appeal from the decision of the department may be taken under Section 63-1-31.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 588, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 488, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-10.1.
Report when student under eighteen who has been issued license, intermediate license or temporary license is coded as drop out.

A school superintendent or designee shall report to the Department of Education on a schedule determined by the State Board of Education when a student under eighteen (18) years of age who has been issued a driver’s license, intermediate license or temporary learning permit has been coded as a “drop out” as defined by the State Board of Education. The Department of Education will provide notification to the Department of Public Safety of those students under eighteen (18) years of age who have obtained a driver’s license, intermediate license or temporary learning permit and have been coded by the local school district as a “drop out” upon verification that prior written parental consent for the release of educational records has been obtained in compliance with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1972, as amended, 20 USC Section 1232.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-11.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The provisions of this article with reference to administration shall be under the supervision of the commissioner of public safety at Jackson, Mississippi, who, if not otherwise specifically authorized, is hereby empowered to make and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8099; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 63-1-13.
Driver Services Division; director; technical, professional and clerical assistants.

The commissioner is hereby authorized and empowered to appoint a Director of the Driver Services Division who is a qualified elector of the State of Mississippi. Such director shall execute and furnish a bond in the amount of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) with a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The bond shall be conditioned on the faithful performance of his duties and be subject to the approval of the commissioner. The director shall have control and supervision of the Driver Services Division and shall be answerable to the commissioner in the performance of his duties.

The commissioner shall employ such other technical, professional and clerical assistants as may be needed to conduct the work of the division. The commissioner is also authorized to employ a Director of the Driver License Examining Bureau and the necessary supervising examiners to assist the Director of the Driver License Examining Bureau in the supervision of the license personnel. The commissioner is also authorized to employ the necessary additional personnel to serve and be designated as license examiners. The commissioner shall not adopt or enforce any policy or any rule or regulation which prohibits any Highway Patrol officer from being employed and serving in any position in the Driver License Examining Bureau. The commissioner shall employ such other technical, professional and clerical assistants as may be needed to conduct the work of the bureau.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8119; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 9; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 7; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 4; Laws, 1952, ch. 357, § 3; Laws, 1960, ch. 338, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 517; Laws, 1973, ch. 410, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 20; Laws, 1995, ch. 421, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 548, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 326, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 63-1-15.
Designation and duties of drivers’ license examiners.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall be authorized to designate persons who may act as examiners for license or instruction permits.

It shall be the duty of the license examiners to forward to the commissioner all applications rejected or approved in accordance with such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8099, 8102; Laws, 1938, 143; Laws, 1940, chs. 157, 167; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 7; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 5; Laws, 1950, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 378, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 493; Laws, 1962, ch. 523; Laws, 1968, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 8; Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 63-1-16.
Department of Public Safety to furnish permanent license kiosk or examiner in each county seat at least one day per month if requested.

The Department of Public Safety shall, upon request of the board of supervisors, furnish either a permanent driver’s license kiosk or a license examiner at a location in each county seat for at least one (1) day every month to conduct licensing examinations, road tests and renewals. It is the option of the board of supervisors so requesting to choose either the permanent driver’s license kiosk or a license examiner. The county shall furnish the office, heating and cooling, phone service and Internet connectivity at the location for the kiosk or license examiner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 517, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 63-1-17.
Maintenance of records relating to licenses and permits.

As the license examiners file their statements showing the serial numbers of licenses and temporary driving permits issued pursuant to this article during the preceding month, the commissioner shall keep a record of all licenses and permits issued pursuant to this article by such examiners, a record of all licenses and permits revoked, a record of all perforated sections mailed to him by the trial judges, and such other information that he deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8118; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 9; Laws, 1989, ch. 482, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 63-1-19.
Application for license; notification of change of address or name by licensee; registration with Selective Service for certain males.

Every applicant for a license or permit issued pursuant to this article, or for renewal of such license or permit, shall file an application for such license, permit or renewal, on a form provided by the Department of Public Safety, with the commissioner or an official license examiner of the department. All persons not holding valid, unexpired licenses issued in this state shall be required to secure an original license, except those specifically exempted from licensing under Section 63-1-7. The application shall state the name, date of birth, the social security number of the applicant unless the applicant is not a United States citizen and does not possess a social security number issued by the United States government, sex, race, color of eyes, color of hair, weight, height and residence address, and whether or not the applicant’s privilege to drive has been suspended or revoked at any time, and, if so, when, by whom, and for what cause, and whether any previous application by him has been denied, and whether he has any physical defects which would interfere with his operating a motor vehicle safely upon the highways.

Every applicant for an original license shall show proof of domicile in this state. The commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to enforce this requirement and shall prescribe the means by which an applicant for an original license may show domicile in this state. Proof of domicile shall not be required of applicants under eighteen (18) years of age.

Unless the applicant is not a United States citizen and does not possess a social security number issued by the United States government, each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972.

No person who is illegally in the United States or Mississippi shall be issued a license. The application of a person who is not a United States citizen and who does not possess a social security number issued by the United States government shall state the name, date of birth, sex, race, color of eyes, color of hair, weight, height and residence address, and whether or not the applicant’s privilege to drive has been suspended or revoked at any time, and, if so, when, by whom, and for what cause, and whether any previous application by him has been denied, and whether he has any physical defects which would interfere with his operating a motor vehicle safely upon the highways. The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as he deems appropriate requiring additional documents, materials, information or physical evidence to be provided by the applicant as may be necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and that the applicant is not present in the United States or the State of Mississippi illegally.

Whenever a person who has applied for or who has been issued a license or permit under this article moves from the address listed in the application or on the permit or license, or whenever the name of a licensee changes by marriage or otherwise, such person, within thirty (30) days thereafter, shall notify, in writing, the Department of Public Safety, Driver Services Division, and inform the department of his or her previous address and new address and of his or her former name and new name. The department shall not change the name of a licensee or permittee on his or her license or permit unless the applicant appears in person at an office of the department and provides a certified copy of his or her marriage license, court order, birth certificate or divorce decree changing the licensee’s or permittee’s name.

Any male who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but less than twenty-six (26) years of age and who applies for a permit or license or a renewal of a permit or license under this chapter shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of Section 3 of the Military Selective Service Act, 50 USCS Appx 451, et seq., as amended.

The department shall forward in an electronic format the necessary personal information of the applicant to the Selective Service System. The applicant’s submission of the application shall serve as an indication that the applicant either has already registered with the Selective Service System or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the Selective Service System the necessary information for registration. The commissioner shall notify the applicant on, or as a part of, the application that his submission of the application will serve as his consent to registration with the Selective Service System, if so required. The commissioner also shall notify any male applicant under the age of eighteen (18) that he will be registered upon turning age eighteen (18) as required by federal law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8094; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1956, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 10; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 19; Laws, 1999, ch. 397, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 388, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 584, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 541, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 63-1-21.
Temporary permits; intermediate licenses.

To obtain a new or original Class R, Class D or intermediate driver’s license, every applicant other than a person holding a valid out-of-state license shall first obtain a regular learner’s permit, successfully complete the examination provided for in Section 63-1-33, and pay the regular learner’s permit fee and examination fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

A regular learner’s permit entitles the holder, if the permit is in his immediate possession, to drive a motor vehicle other than a motorcycle on the highways of the State of Mississippi only when accompanied by a licensed operator who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age and who is actually occupying the seat beside the driver. A regular learner’s permit may be issued to any applicant who is at least fifteen (15) years of age and shall be valid for a period of two (2) years from the date of issue.

An intermediate license allows unsupervised driving from 6:00 a.m. to 10:00 p.m. Sunday through Thursday and 6:00 a.m. to 11:30 p.m. Friday and Saturday, and allows unsupervised driving any time for a person traveling directly to or from work. At all other times the intermediate licensee must be supervised by a parent, guardian or other person aged twenty-one (21) years or older who holds a valid driver’s license under this article and who is actually occupying the seat beside the driver.

The fee for issuance of an intermediate license shall be as prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8095; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1956, ch. 378, § 2; Laws, 1964, ch. 454; Laws, 1966, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 588, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 624, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 488, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 467, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 489, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 10, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 63-1-23.
Signature and verification of application for license of person under seventeen years of age by parents or other responsible person.

The application of any person under the age of seventeen (17) years for a temporary driving permit, intermediate license or license issued pursuant to this article shall be signed and verified before a person authorized to administer oaths by both the father and mother of the applicant, if both are living and have custody of him, or in the event neither parent is living then by the person or guardian having such custody or by an employer of him, or in the event there is no guardian or employer then by any other responsible person who is willing to assume the obligation imposed under Section 63-1-25 upon a person signing the application of a minor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8096; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 11; Laws, 2000, ch. 624, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 63-1-25.
Imputation of negligence or willful misconduct of driver under seventeen years of age to person signing application for license.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 63-1-27, any negligence or wilful misconduct of a minor under the age of seventeen years when driving a motor vehicle upon a highway shall be imputed to the person who has signed the application of such minor for a permit or license, which person shall be jointly or severally liable with such minor for any damages caused by such negligence or wilful misconduct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8096; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 63-1-27.
Request for cancellation of minor’s license by person signing application; release from liability for negligence or misconduct of minor.

Any person who has signed the application of a minor for a license may thereafter file with the commissioner a verified written request that the license of said minor so granted be canceled. Thereupon the commissioner shall cancel the license of said minor and the person who signed the application of such minor shall be relieved from the liability imposed under Section 63-1-25 by reason of having signed such application on account of any subsequent negligence or wilful misconduct of such minor in operating a motor vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8097; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 63-1-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 588, § 9, eff from and after September 1, 1995.

[Codes, 1942, § 8098; Laws, 1938, ch. 143]

§ 63-1-31.
Appeal from denial of application for license or temporary permit.

When a person is denied a license or any temporary driving permit after filing the proper application, he shall have the right within sixty (60) days thereafter to file a petition, in the county or circuit court in the county wherein the application was filed, praying for a hearing in the matter before the judge of the court in which the application is presented. The judge is hereby vested with jurisdiction to hear such matters forthwith within termtime or during vacation, upon five (5) days’ written notice to the officer who refused to issue the license or any temporary driving permit. The hearing shall be conducted at a place as may suit the convenience of the court. On the hearing of the petition, testimony may be taken, and the court shall render judgment in the matter as it deems right and proper under the law and evidence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8105; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 12; Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 1, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2016.

§ 63-1-33.
Examination of applicant for license or regular learner’s permit; inspection of applicant’s automobile; certification of successful completion of driver education and training program at secondary school in lieu of examination.

Except as otherwise provided under subsection (6) of this section, it shall be the duty of the license examiner, when application is made for an operator’s license or regular learner’s permit, to test the applicant’s ability to read and understand road signs and to give the required signals as adopted by the National Advisory Committee on Uniform Traffic Control Devices and the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators.

Except as otherwise provided under subsection (6) of this section, the commissioner shall have prepared and administer a test composed of at least ten (10) questions relating to the safe operation of a motor vehicle and testing the applicant’s knowledge of the proper operation of a motor vehicle. Every examination shall ensure adequate knowledge on the part of the applicant as to school bus safety requirements.

Prior to the administration of the test, the license examiner shall inspect the horn, lights, brakes, vehicle registration and proof of liability coverage of the motor vehicle which the applicant expects to operate while being tested, and if he finds that any of the aforementioned items are deficient, no license or endorsement shall be issued to the applicant until same have been repaired.

An applicant for a Mississippi driver’s license who, at the time of application, holds a valid motor vehicle driver’s license issued by another state shall not be required to take a written test.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 63-1-6, when application is made for an original motorcycle endorsement, the applicant shall be required to pass a written test which consists of questions relating to the safe operation of a motorcycle and a skill test similar to the “Motorcycle Operator Skill Test,” which is endorsed by the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators. The commissioner may exempt any applicant from the skill test if the applicant presents a certificate showing successful completion of a course approved by the commissioner, which includes a similar examination of skills needed in the safe operation of a motorcycle.

The Department of Public Safety may accept the certification of successful completion of an individual’s training in the knowledge and skills needed for the proper and safe operation of a motor vehicle from a driver education and training program at a secondary school that meets the standards of the department, in lieu of the department administering the examination of the individual for the purpose of obtaining a driver’s license. The commissioner and the State Board of Education shall jointly promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this subsection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8100; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1985, ch. 376, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 352, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 393, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 614, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 481, § 5; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 20; Laws, 2015, ch. 417, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-1-34.
Provision of video-taped instructional material to assist reading impaired applicants in preparing for driver’s license examinations.

From and after January 1, 1991, the Mississippi Authority for Educational Television shall prepare and the Commissioner of Public Safety shall make available for loan to applicants for driving permits and licenses under this article and under Article 5 of this chapter, who are reading impaired, video tapes of instructional material designed to assist such applicants in preparing for driver’s license examinations. The commissioner shall be authorized to charge and collect a fee from any person to whom any such video tape is loaned, such fee to serve as security for the return of the video tape and which fee shall be refunded to the person upon return of the video tape to the commissioner. Such fee shall be in an amount as the commissioner determines necessary to defray the actual cost to the commissioner in replacing the video tape but shall not exceed the amount of the fee provided by law to be paid for the issuance of the class of driver’s license for which the person is applying. The video tape shall be returned, in good working order, to the location that such tape was borrowed in order for the individual to receive his security refund. In the event such tape is not returned within thirty (30) days from time of rental all security fees will be forfeited to the Department of Public Safety. Such security funds and all forfeited fees shall be placed in a separate interest-bearing account known as the “Driver License Educational Fund for the Reading Impaired.” All forfeited security fees shall be used to replace unreturned tapes and to offset the cost of this program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 319, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 560, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 63-1-34.1.
Issuance of limited driver’s license for persons using bioptic telescopic lenses; rehabilitation permit.

The Commissioner of Public Safety may issue a limited driver’s license for persons using bioptic telescopic lenses. The license shall be valid for one (1) year from the date of issuance. The commissioner may require the reevaluation of a licensee before the reissuance of a limited driver’s license.

The commissioner shall prepare and administer a test for the central and peripheral vision of persons using bioptic telescopic lenses. If the person passes the test and is otherwise qualified, the person may receive a license under this section.

The commissioner may issue a one-year driving rehabilitation permit subject to such restrictions as the commissioner may require.

The fee for a license or permit issued under this section shall be the fee required for one-year licenses under Section 63-1-43, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The commissioner may impose restrictions on any license or permit issued under this section and may issue rules and regulations governing such licenses and permits.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 393, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.